New York, session 2025-2026, A10469.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (e) and (f) of subdivision 1 of section 812 of 2 the family court act, as amended by chapter 541 of the laws of 2024, are 3 amended and a new paragraph (g) is added to read as follows: 4 (e) persons who are not related by consanguinity or affinity and who 5 are or have been in an intimate relationship regardless of whether such 6 persons have lived together at any time. Factors the court may consider 7 in determining whether a relationship is an "intimate relationship" 8 include but are not limited to: the nature or type of relationship, 9 regardless of whether the relationship is sexual in nature; the frequen- 10 cy of interaction between the persons; and the duration of the relation- 11 ship. Neither a casual acquaintance nor ordinary fraternization between 12 two individuals in business or social contexts shall be deemed to 13 constitute an "intimate relationship"; [and] 14 (f) persons who are related by consanguinity or affinity to parties 15 who are or have been in an intimate relationship as defined in paragraph 16 (e) of this subdivision[.]; and 17 (g) persons who are not related by consanguinity or affinity, where 18 one such person is the spouse or intimate partner of such other person's 19 former spouse or former intimate partner. For the purposes of this para- 20 graph, the term "intimate partner" shall mean a relationship where two 21 individuals are in an intimate relationship, as defined by paragraph (e) 22 of this subdivision. 23 § 2. Paragraphs (e) and (f) of subdivision 1 of section 530.11 of the 24 criminal procedure law, as amended by chapter 541 of the laws of 2024, 25 are amended and a new paragraph (g) is added to read as follows: 26 (e) persons who are not related by consanguinity or affinity and who 27 are or have been in an intimate relationship regardless of whether such 28 persons have lived together at any time. Factors the court may consider EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14688-01-6 A. 10469 2 1 in determining whether a relationship is an "intimate relationship" 2 include but are not limited to: the nature or type of relationship, 3 regardless of whether the relationship is sexual in nature; the frequen- 4 cy of interaction between the persons; and the duration of the relation- 5 ship. Neither a casual acquaintance nor ordinary fraternization between 6 two individuals in business or social contexts shall be deemed to 7 constitute an "intimate relationship"; [and] 8 (f) persons who are related by consanguinity or affinity to parties 9 who are or have been in an intimate relationship as defined in paragraph 10 (e) of this subdivision[.]; and 11 (g) persons who are not related by consanguinity or affinity, where 12 one such person is the spouse or intimate partner of such other person's 13 former spouse or former intimate partner. For the purposes of this para- 14 graph, the term "intimate partner" shall mean a relationship where two 15 individuals are in an intimate relationship, as defined by paragraph (e) 16 of this subdivision. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.